Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2423.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-27.3-108.2 and 23-27.3-108.2 of the General Laws in Chapter
23-27.3 entitled "State Building Code" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-108.2. Duties of the state building code commissioner.
(a) The state building code commissioner shall have the authority to enforce and perform
the duties required by the state building code, chapter 27.3 of this title, and all codes referenced
therein and adopted thereunder, and all other provisions of the general laws and public laws insofar
as such powers and duties relate to building codes and building inspection; provided, however, that
for the purposes of this section structures constituting tents and/or membrane frame structures as
defined in this state building code and any regulations promulgated hereunder shall be subject to
an annual certification process to be established by the state building commissioner in conjunction
with the state fire marshal and shall not be subject to recurring permit and fee requirements as
otherwise required by this code.
(b) The state building code commissioner shall work to standardize building code
interpretations across the state with input from the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns and
ensure consistent enforcement of the code throughout the state.
(c) Permit fees. Permit fees for the construction under this chapter shall be established by
the committee. The fees shall be deposited as general revenues.
(1) Building permit fees. The state building official or the local cites and towns, as
applicable, shall charge each permit applicant an additional one-tenth percent (0.1%) levy of the

total construction cost for each commercial permit issued, and two-tenths percent (0.2%) levy of
the total construction cost for each residential permit issued. The levy shall be limited to a
maximum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each of the permits issued for one-, two (2)-, three (3)-
, and four (4)-family dwellings. This additional levy shall be transmitted monthly to the state
building code office; and
(i) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits and one hundred
percent (100%) of this additional levy on commercial permits shall be used to staff and support the
purchase or lease and operation of a web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state
and municipalities for uniform, statewide electronic plan submission, review, permit management,
and inspection system and other programs described in this chapter. This portion of the fee levy
shall be deposited as general revenues.
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits shall be transferred to
the department of labor and training and shall be deposited into the contractor training restricted
receipt account, which shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
Subject to appropriation by the general assembly, these funds shall be used to provide residential
contractor training grants for programs that shall include, but are not limited to, minority business
enterprises and state local building officials.
(2) Fees for electronic permitting from other state agencies and cities and towns. The
local cities and towns and any state agency utilizing an electronic permitting platform, except as
set forth in this section, shall charge each applicant in accordance with §§ 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46,
45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1, 45-53-16, and 46-23-30 as applicable.
(d) Electronic permitting.
(1) For purposes of this section, “electronic permitting” means the use of computer-based
tools and services through a platform which automates and streamlines the application and permit
process to include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for applications, submission of plans,
checklists, reports and other documents, reviews, permitting, scheduling, review and project
tracking, comments from staff and committees, fee calculation and collection; and workflow and
report management
(2) On or before July 1, 2013, the building commissioner shall develop a standard statewide
process for electronic plan submission, review, permit management, and inspection. The process
shall include, but not be limited to: applications a uniform application; submission of building plans
and plans for developments and plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling;
project tracking; fee calculation and collections; and workflow and report management.
(3) On or before December 1, 2013, the building commissioner shall implement the
LC004348 - Page 2 of 6

standard statewide process for electronic plan submission, review, permit management, and
inspection. In addition, the building commissioner, through the department of business regulation,
shall develop a technology and implementation plan for a standard web-accessible service or
system to be utilized by the state and municipalities for uniform, statewide electronic plan
submission, review, permit management, and inspection for building permits. The plan shall
include, but not be limited to: applications a uniform application; submission of building plans and
plans for developments and plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling;
project tracking; fee calculation and collections; and workflow and report management.
(4) The building commissioner shall implement the standard statewide process for
electronic permitting to be utilized pursuant to this section and §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-
17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1, 45-53-16, and 46-23-30. In addition, the building commissioner
shall develop a technology and implementation plan for a web-accessible service or system to be
utilized by the state and municipalities for these purposes and shall cause the purchase or lease and
operation of a web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities
for electronic permitting (“electronic permitting platform”).
(e) All electronic permitting fees collected by the state building code office shall be
remitted to the department of business regulation, which funds shall be used to staff and support
the purchase or lease and operation of a web-accessible service or system to be utilized by the state
and municipalities for electronic permitting.
(f) The building commissioner shall, upon request by any state contractor described in §
37-2-38.1, review, and when all conditions for certification have been met, certify to the state
controller that the payment conditions contained in § 37-2-38.1 have been met.
(g) The building commissioner shall coordinate the development and implementation of
this section with the state fire marshal to assist with the implementation of § 23-28.2-6. On or before
January 1, 2022, the building commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement
the provisions of this section and §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1,
45-53-16, and 46-23-30.
(h) The building commissioner shall submit, in coordination with the state fire marshal, a
report to the governor and general assembly on or before April 1, 2013, and each April 1 thereafter,
providing the status of the web-accessible service(s) and/or system(s) implementation and any
recommendations for process or system improvement. In every report submitted on or after April,
2024, the building commissioner shall provide the following information:
(1) The identity of every municipality and state agencies, as applicable, in full compliance
with the provisions of §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1, 45-53-16,
LC004348 - Page 3 of 6

and 46-23-30 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) The identity of every municipality or state agencies, as applicable, failing to fully
implement and comply with the provisions of §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1,
45-24-58.1, 45-53-16, and 46-23-30 and/or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of this section, and the nature, extent, and basis or reason for the failure or
noncompliance; and
(3) Recommendations to achieve compliance by all municipalities or state agencies, as
applicable, with the provisions of §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1,
45-53-16, and 46-23-30 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.
(i) The building commissioner shall assist with facilitating the goals and objectives set forth
in § 28-42-84(a)(9).
(j) The state building code commissioner shall serve as the executive secretary to the state
building code standards committee.
(k) In addition to the state building code commissioner’s other duties as set forth in this
chapter, and notwithstanding the same, the state building code commissioner and the
commissioner’s staff shall assume the authority for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of the
state building code in a municipality where there is no local building official or alternate as detailed
in § 23-27.3-107.2, or where there are no local building inspectors.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-14 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Business
Regulation" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-14-20. Uniform electronic permitting.
(a) In conjunction with implementing electronic permitting for construction permits and
development applications pursuant to §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 45-23-36.1, and 45-24-58.1, the state
building commissioner shall, with the assistance of the office of regulatory reform, adopt and
implement electronic permitting for any other category of state or local permit authorized under
state law and that the commissioner deems to significantly impact the expediency of construction
and development. The commissioner shall develop a schedule identifying state and local permits
to migrate to electronic permitting under this section.
(b) For purposes of this section, “electronic permitting” means use of computer-based tools
and services that automate and streamline the application process to include, but not be limited to,
task-specific tools for: applications; submission of plans; completed checklists and checklist
documents; reports; plan review; permitting; scheduling; project tracking; staff and technical
review committee comments; fee calculation and collection.
(c) The state building commissioner pursuant to the provisions of § 23-27.3-108.2 may
LC004348 - Page 4 of 6

promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
(d) For any category of permit designated to migrate to electronic permitting, the state
agency or local municipality issuing the permit shall charge each applicant an additional one-tenth
of one percent (0.001%) of the total application fee for each application submitted. This additional
amount shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office at the department of business
regulation and shall be used to staff and support the purchase or lease and operation of one web-
accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities for the uniform,
statewide electronic submission, review and processing of permit applications as set forth in this
section.
(e) All acts, requirements, filings, and documents necessary to comply with the permit
process for a category of permits designated by the state builder commissioner to migrate to
electronic permitting shall be conducted by means of electronic permitting according to the
timetable set forth by the commissioner unless granted a further extension at the commissioner’s
discretion.
(f) The department of business regulation shall reimburse annual fees and costs associated
with compliance with this program in accordance with procedures established by the department.
(g) All departments, offices, boards and agencies of the state shall cooperate with the state
building commissioner and furnish such administrative and staff support, advice, information,
documents and otherwise, data and data analysis and other support as may be necessary or desirable
to implement this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004348
========
LC004348 - Page 5 of 6